test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VV_makomii_gt-norm.yaml
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nimakomiimishinaaning
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nimakomiimishinaanin
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nimakomiimishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gimakomiimishinaaning
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gimakomiimishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gimakomiimishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gimakomiimishiwaang
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gimakomiimishiwaan
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gimakomiimishiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: omakomiimishiniing
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: omakomiimishiniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: omakomiimishiniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: omakomiimishiwaang
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: omakomiimishiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: omakomiimishiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nimakomiimishibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nimakomiimishibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nimakomiimishibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gimakomiimishibaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gimakomiimishibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gimakomiimishibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: omakomiimishibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: omakomiimishibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: omakomiimishibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: imakomiimishibaniing
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: imakomiimishibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: imakomiimishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimakomiiminaanibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimakomiiminaanibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimakomiiminaanibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimakomiiminaanidig, nimakomiiminaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimakomiiminaanidig, nimakomiiminaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimakomiiminaanidig, nimakomiiminaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: gimakomiiminaanibaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+Pret+Obv: gimakomiiminaanibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+Pret+Pl: gimakomiiminaanibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimakomiiminaanidig, gimakomiiminaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimakomiiminaanidig, gimakomiiminaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimakomiiminaanidig, gimakomiiminaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimakomiimiwaabaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimakomiimiwaabaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimakomiimiwaabaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimakomiimiwaadig, gimakomiimiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimakomiimiwaadig, gimakomiimiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimakomiimiwaadig, gimakomiimiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omakomiiminiibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omakomiiminiibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omakomiiminiibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omakomiiminiidig, omakomiiminiidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omakomiiminiidig, omakomiiminiidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omakomiiminiidig, omakomiiminiidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omakomiimiwaabaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omakomiimiwaabaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omakomiimiwaabaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omakomiimiwaadig, omakomiimiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omakomiimiwaadig, omakomiimiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omakomiimiwaadig, omakomiimiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimakomiishinaanibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimakomiishinaanibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimakomiishinaanibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimakomiishinaanidig, nimakomiishinaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimakomiishinaanidig, nimakomiishinaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimakomiishinaanidig, nimakomiishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gimakomiishinaanibaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gimakomiishinaanibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gimakomiishinaanibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gimakomiishinaanidig, gimakomiishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gimakomiishinaanidig, gimakomiishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gimakomiishinaanidig, gimakomiishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gimakomiishiwaabaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gimakomiishiwaabaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gimakomiishiwaabaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gimakomiishiwaadig, gimakomiishiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gimakomiishiwaadig, gimakomiishiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gimakomiishiwaadig, gimakomiishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: omakomiishiniibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: omakomiishiniibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: omakomiishiniibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [omakomiishiniidig, omakomiishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [omakomiishiniidig, omakomiishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [omakomiishiniidig, omakomiishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: omakomiishiwaabaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: omakomiishiwaabaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: omakomiishiwaabaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [omakomiishiwaadig, omakomiishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [omakomiishiwaadig, omakomiishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [omakomiishiwaadig, omakomiishiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nimakomiinyimishinaaniban
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nimakomiinyimishinaanidig, nimakomiinyimishinaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nimakomiinsimishinaaniban
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nimakomiinsimishinaanidig, nimakomiinsimishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gimakomiinyimishinaaniban
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gimakomiinyimishinaanidig, gimakomiinyimishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gimakomiinyimishiwaaban
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gimakomiinyimishiwaadig, gimakomiinyimishiwaadog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gimakomiinsimishinaaniban
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gimakomiinsimishinaanidig, gimakomiinsimishinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gimakomiinsimishiwaaban
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gimakomiinsimishiwaadig, gimakomiinsimishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: omakomiinyimishiniiban
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [omakomiinyimishiniidig, omakomiinyimishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: omakomiinyimishiwaaban
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [omakomiinyimishiwaadig, omakomiinyimishiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: omakomiinsimishiniiban
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [omakomiinsimishiniidig, omakomiinsimishiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: omakomiinsimishiwaaban
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [omakomiinsimishiwaadig, omakomiinsimishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nimakomiinyimishinaaning
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nimakomiinyimishinaanin
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nimakomiinyimishinaanin
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nimakomiinsimishinaaning
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nimakomiinsimishinaanin
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nimakomiinsimishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gimakomiinyimishinaaning
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gimakomiinyimishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gimakomiinyimishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gimakomiinyimishiwaang
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gimakomiinyimishiwaan
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gimakomiinyimishiwaan
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gimakomiinsimishinaaning
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gimakomiinsimishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gimakomiinsimishinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gimakomiinsimishiwaang
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gimakomiinsimishiwaan
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gimakomiinsimishiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: omakomiinyimishiniing
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: omakomiinyimishiniin
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: omakomiinyimishiniin
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: omakomiinyimishiwaang
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: omakomiinyimishiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: omakomiinyimishiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: omakomiinsimishiniing
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: omakomiinsimishiniin
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: omakomiinsimishiniin
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: omakomiinsimishiwaang
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: omakomiinsimishiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: omakomiinsimishiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nimakomiinyimishibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nimakomiinyimishibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nimakomiinyimishibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nimakomiinsimishibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nimakomiinsimishibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nimakomiinsimishibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gimakomiinyimishibaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gimakomiinyimishibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gimakomiinyimishibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gimakomiinsimishibaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gimakomiinsimishibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gimakomiinsimishibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: omakomiinyimishibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: omakomiinyimishibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: omakomiinyimishibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: omakomiinsimishibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: omakomiinsimishibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: omakomiinsimishibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: imakomiinyimishibaniing
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: imakomiinyimishibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: imakomiinyimishibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: imakomiinsimishibaniing
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: imakomiinsimishibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: imakomiinsimishibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimakomiinyiminaanibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimakomiinyiminaanibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimakomiinyiminaanibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimakomiinyiminaanidig, nimakomiinyiminaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimakomiinyiminaanidig, nimakomiinyiminaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimakomiinyiminaanidig, nimakomiinyiminaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nimakomiinsiminaanibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nimakomiinsiminaanibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nimakomiinsiminaanibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nimakomiinsiminaanidig, nimakomiinsiminaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nimakomiinsiminaanidig, nimakomiinsiminaanidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nimakomiinsiminaanidig, nimakomiinsiminaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: gimakomiinyiminaanibaniing
